District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0178.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Natural Areas Conservation Program Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. The Department of Energy and Environment Establishment Act of 2005, effective
February 15, 2006 (D.C. Law 16-51; D.C. Official Code § 8-151.01 et seq.), is amended as follows:
(a) Section 101 (D.C. Official Code § 8-151.01) is amended as follows:
(1) A new paragraph (1A) is added to read as follows:

“(1A) “Conservation easement” means a nonpossessory interest of a holder in real
property imposing limitations or affirmative obligations the purposes of which include retaining
or protecting natural, scenic, or open-space values of real property, ensuring its availability for
agricultural, forestal, recreational, or open-space use, protecting natural resources, maintaining or
enhancing air or water quality, or preserving the historical, architectural, archaeological, or cultural
aspects of real property.”.
(2) A new paragraph (7A) is added to read as follows:
“(7A) “Integrated pest management” means a sustainable approach to managing
pests by combining biological, cultural, physical, and chemical tools in a way that minimizes
economic, health, and environmental risks.”.
(3) A new paragraph (8A) is added to read as follows:
“(8A) “Low-impact recreation” means non-motorized outdoor, nature-based
recreational activities, including, but not limited to, boating, swimming, fishing, hiking,
picnicking, nature observation, photography, cross-country skiing, snowshoeing, and
enjoyment of open space.”.
(4) New paragraphs (9A) and (9B) are added to read as follows:
“(9A) “NACP” means the Natural Areas Conservation Program established by
section 109f.”.
“(9B) “Natural areas” means undeveloped or wild lands and those lands preserved
or restored and managed for their natural features, including but not limited to parks, forests,
grasslands, wetlands and shorelines on public and private lands.”.
(5) A new paragraph (13B) is added to read as follows:

“(13B) “Stewardship” means activities undertaken to maintain natural areas to
prevent the deterioration or impairment of a natural area, or land use, including management of
vegetation such as removal of invasive plants and planting of native species.”.
(b) New sections 109f and 109g are added to read as follows:
“Sec. 109f. Natural Areas Conservation Program establishment.
“(a) There is established the Natural Areas Conservation Program within DOEE. The
purpose of the NACP is to provide stewardship of natural areas owned or managed by the District.
“(b) NACP shall:
“(1) Provide stewardship of and restore the ecological function and value of
District-owned natural areas through integrated pest management and planting of native plants;
(2) Collaborate with the Department of Transportation on managing trees in
District-owned and -managed natural areas;
“(3) Develop expertise in integrated pest management, invasive plants, and the
promotion of native plants;
“(4) Collaborate with the University of the District of Columbia on the
propagation of native plants and operation of a native plant nursery;
“(5) Have the authority to develop Memorandums of Understanding (MOUs) with
the National Park Service (“NPS”) and other Federal agencies to supplement stewardship of
Federally-owned and -managed natural areas;
“(6) Coordinate with the Department of Parks and Recreation to allow low-impact
recreation in natural areas by installing and maintaining trails and signage;

“(5) Coordinate efforts to remove trash and combat illegal dumping in natural
areas in consultation with the Department of Public Works, Metropolitan Police Department,
United States Park Police and non-profit partners;
“(6) Monitor, track, and report on the state of the District’s Natural Areas;
“(7) Develop the Natural Areas Stewardship and Invasive Plant Response Plan
required by section 109g;
“(8) Partner with non-profit organizations, community-based groups, and
individuals to assist in the stewardship of natural areas; and
“(9) Coordinate Natural Areas Stewardship Projects (“Projects”) that supplement
DOEE’s stewardship of natural areas on District-owned and -managed lands. The Projects shall:
“(A) Provide technical assistance and training to individuals,
organizations, and grantees on the promotion of native plants and the removal of invasive plant
species; and
“(B) Provide tools and equipment to support trained groups in invasive
plant management and trash removal.”.
“(c) DOEE, pursuant to Title I of the District of Columbia Administrative Procedure Act,
100 approved October 21, 1968 (82 Stat. 1204; D.C. Official Code § 2-501 et seq.), shall have the
101 authority to issue rules to implement the provisions of sections 109f and 109g.
102 “(d) The NACP may issue grants in furtherance of its duties identified in subsection (b)
103 of this section, including to support Natural Areas Stewardship Projects.”.
104 “Sec. 109g. Natural Areas Stewardship and Invasive Plant Response Plan.

105 “(a) Within 24 months of the applicability date of this section, DOEE shall develop a
106 Natural Areas Stewardship and Invasive Plant Response Plan (“Plan”) to establish a strategic
107 vision for the stewardship of the District’s natural areas, and the Plan shall:
108 “(1) Identify and map all natural areas in the District;
109 “(2) Identify strategies for promoting the growth of native plants and managing
110 the removal of invasive plant species in District-owned and -managed natural areas;
111 “(3) Assess the use of critical area designations, as defined by D.C. Code § 8–
112 1731.02, and conservation easements to establish permanent protection for District-owned and -
113 managed natural areas and, if appropriate, provide recommendations for specific natural areas
114 that should receive a critical area designation or conservation easement; and
115 “(4) Assess, in coordination with the Department of Parks and Recreation and the
116 Department of Transportation, how to allow low-impact recreation in District-owned natural
117 areas with trails and signage.
118 “(b) The Plan shall include cost estimates for fulfilling each goal identified in subsection
119 (a) of this section.
120 “(c) At least 60 days prior to the adoption of the Plan, the NACP shall:
121 “(1) Publish a draft Plan for a public comment period of no less than 30 days; and
122 “(2) Convene at least 2 public meetings, including one for residents east of the
123 Anacostia River, to solicit public testimony and written comments on the draft Plan.”.
124 Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
125 The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
126 impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
127 approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code§ 1-301.47a).

128 Sec. 4. Effective date.
129 This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
130 Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
131 provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
132 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
133 Columbia Register.